Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1374
Removal of infected or exposed animals; owner; responsibilities.

Following the removal of infected or exposed animals, the premises shall be cleaned and disinfected by the owner under the supervision of the department, in accordance with the rules and regulations duly adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 1983, LB 573, § 8.